Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Certificate of Authority

271B.15-010.
Annual report.

A foreign corporation transacting business in this Commonwealth is subject to KRS

14A.6-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
153, effective January 1, 1989; 1990, ch. 199, §
1, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 137, §
71, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 151, §
55, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed and reenacted without change to the existing language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, effective 7/15/10, and repealed and reenacted with the new language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, effective 1/1/2011. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment by ch. 51 not serve to void amendments made by other bills, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

271B.15-020.
Consequences of transacting business without authority. [Repealed.]

271B.15-030.
Application for certificate of authority — Requirement for agent’s written acceptance of appointment. [Repealed.]

271B.15-040.
Amended certificate of authority. [Repealed.]

271B.15-050.
Effect of certificate of authority. [Repealed.]

271B.15-060.
Corporate name of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

271B.15-070.
Registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation — Requirement for agent’s written acceptance of appointment. [Repealed.]

271B.15-080.
Change of registered office or registered agent of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

271B.15-090.
Resignation of registered agent of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

271B.15-100.
Service on foreign corporation. [Repealed.]